pl: Konstrukcja samochodu zabytkowego: Kryty powóz jednokonny; Grand tourer; Powóz bezkonny; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Zabytkowy samochód wyścigowy; Drewniane kombi; Inne
pt-PT: Design de carros antigos: Brougham; Grand tourer; Carruagem sem cavalos; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pónei; T-bucket; Vintage racer; Woody wagon; Outro
bg-BG: Дизайн на антикварни автомобили: Карета; Гранд турър; Карета без коне; Хот род; Kustom; Lead sled; Лоурайдър; Масъл; Пони; T-bucket; Винтидж състезателна; Дървен вагон; Други
de: Oldtimer-Design: Brougham; Großer Tourer; Pferdelose Kutsche; Hot Rod; Kustom; Lead Sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-Bucket; Oldtimer-Rennwagen; Woody-Wagen; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Antikvarinis automobilio dizainas: Brougham; Grand tourer; Vežimas be arklio; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Vinažinės lenktyninės; Medinis furgonas; Kita
ro-RO: Design mașini de epocă: Brougham; Grand tourer; Trăsură fără cai; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Mașină de curse vintage; Woody wagon; Altele
hu: Antik autó kialakítása: Brougham; Grand tourer; Ló nélküli kocsi; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Vintage racer; Woody wagon; Egyéb
es: Diseño de autos antiguos: Brougham; Gran turismo; Carruaje sin caballos; Hot rod; Custom; Trineo de plomo; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Corredor de época; Woody wagon; Otros
sl-SI: Zasnova starodobnega avtomobila: Kočija; Grand tourer; Kočija brez konj; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Model Muscle; Model Pony; T-bucket; Starodobni dirkač; Lesena karoserija (woody wagon); Drugo
hr-HR: Dizajn starodobnog automobila: Brougham; Grand Tourer; Kočija bez konja; Hot Rod; Kustom; Lead Sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Poni; T-bucket; Vintage za utrke; Woody Wagon; Ostalo
th: การออกแบบรถยนต์โบราณ: บรูแฮม; แกรนด์ทัวเรอร์; รถม้าไร้คนขับ; ฮอตร็อด; คัสตอม; รถลากเลื่อน; โลว์ไรเดอร์; มัสเคิล; ม้าโพนี่; ทีบักเก็ต; นักแข่งวินเทจ; รถบรรทุกไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 古董车设计: Brougham; 豪华旅行车; 无马马车; 高性能改装车; 老式改装车; 重型车; 低趴车; 肌肉车; 小马车; T 型车; 复古赛车; 木质旅行车; 其他
tr: Antika araba tasarımı: Brougham; Grand tourer; Atsız araba; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Kaslı; Pony; T-bucket; Vintage racer; Woody wagon; Diğer
el: Σχέδιο αυτοκινήτου αντίκας: Brougham; Grand tourer; Άμαξα χωρίς άλογα; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Πόνυ; T-bucket; Vintage racer; Woody wagon; Άλλο
sv: Antik bildesign: Brougham; Grand Tourer; Horseless Carriage; Hot Rod; Kustom; Lead Sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Vintage Racer; Woody Wagon; Övrigt
fi: Museoajoneuvon muotoilu: Brougham; Grand tourer; Vaunu ilman hevosta; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muskeli; Poni; T-bucket; Vintage-kilpa-auto; Woody wagon; Muu
vi: Thiết kế xe cổ: Brougham; Xe du lịch lớn; Xe ngựa không dùng ngựa; Xe cải tiến; Kustom; Xe chì trượt; Xe độ hạ gầm; Cơ bắp; Ngựa con; Xe t-bucket; Xe đua cổ điển; Xe ô tô ốp gỗ; Khác
nl: Antiek auto-ontwerp: Brougham; Grand Tourer; Rijtuig zonder paard(en); Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Oldtimer; Houten wagen; Andere
fr: Conception de voiture ancienne: Brougham; Grand tourisme; Voiture sans chevaux; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Poney; T-bucket; Voiture de course vintage; Carrosserie en bois; Autre
pt-BR: Design de carro antigo: Brougham; Grand tourer; Carruagem sem cavalos; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Rebaixado; Muscle; Pônei; T-bucket; Carro de corrida clássico; Woody wagon; Outro
en: Antique car design: Brougham; Grand tourer; Horseless carriage; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Vintage racer; Woody wagon; Other
sk-SK: Dizajn starožitného auta: Brougham; Grand tourer; Kočiar bez koní; Hot rod; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muscle; Pony; T-bucket; Vintage racer; Woody wagon; Iné
ko: 앤틱카 디자인: 브루엄; 그랜드 투어러; 말 없는 마차; 핫로드; 커스텀; 리드 썰매; 로우라이더; 머슬카; 포니; T버킷; 빈티지 레이서; 우디 왜건; 기타
cs: Design historického vozu: Veterán se sedadlem pro řidiče venku; Veterán se sklopnou střechou; Automobilový veterán; Vyladěný automobilový veterán; Veterán Kustom; Veterán Lead Sled; Vyladěný veterán se sníženým podvozkem; Vysoce výkonný veterán Muscle; Veterán Pony; Závodní veterán T-Bucket; Závodní veterán; Veterán Woody Wagon; Jiné
nb: Antikk bildesign: Brougham; Grand tourer; Hesteløs vogn; Raggarbil; Kustom; Lead sled; Lowrider; Muskelbil; Ponni; T-bucket; Veteranracerbil; Woody-vogn; Annet
ru: Дизайн старинного автомобиля: Брогам; GT; Безлошадный экипаж; Хот-род; Модифицированный; Lead sled; Заниженный; Маслкар; Спортивный дизайн; T-bucket; Винтажный гоночный; Деревянный автомобиль; Другой
da: Antik bildesign: Brougham; Grand tourer; Automobil; Hot rod; Kustom; Blyslæde; Lowrider; Muskel; Pony; T-bucket; Vintage racerbil; Woody wagon; Andet
it: Design di auto d'epoca: Brougham; Gran turismo; Carrozza senza cavalli; Auto sportiva; Kustom; Slitta; Automobile ribassata; Muscolo; Pony; T-bucket; Auto da corsa d'epoca; Woody wagon; Altro
zh-TW: 古董車設計: Brougham; 豪華旅行車; 無馬馬車; 高性能改裝車; 改裝車; 鉛製重型車; 低底車; 肌肉車; 經濟型小車; T-桶車; 復古賽車; 木質旅行車; 其他
ja: アンティークカーのデザイン: ブロアム; グランドツアラー; 馬なし馬車; ホットロッド; カスタム; リードそり; ローライダー; 筋肉; ポニー; Tバケツ; ヴィンテージレーサー; ウッディワゴン; その他